Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.2.
Emergency Services and Disaster Law.

Sec.

44-146.17. Powers and duties of Governor.

44-146.17.

44-146.28:1. Compact enacted into law; terms.

§ 44-146.17. Powers and duties of Governor.

The Governor shall be Director of Emergency Management. He shall take such action from time to time as is necessary for the adequate promotion and coordination of state and local emergency services activities relating to the safety and welfare of the Commonwealth in time of disasters.

The Governor shall have, in addition to his powers hereinafter or elsewhere prescribed by law, the following powers and duties:

To proclaim and publish such rules and regulations and to issue such orders as may, in his judgment, be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to such measures as are in his judgment required to control, restrict, allocate or regulate the use, sale, production and distribution of food, fuel, clothing and other commodities, materials, goods, services and resources under any state or federal emergency services programs.

He may adopt and implement the Commonwealth of Virginia Emergency Operations Plan, which provides for state-level emergency operations in response to any type of disaster or large-scale emergency affecting Virginia and that provides the needed framework within which more detailed emergency plans and procedures can be developed and maintained by state agencies, local governments and other organizations.

He may direct and compel evacuation of all or part of the populace from any stricken or threatened area if this action is deemed necessary for the preservation of life, implement emergency mitigation, preparedness, response or recovery actions; prescribe routes, modes of transportation and destination in connection with evacuation; and control ingress and egress at an emergency area, including the movement of persons within the area and the occupancy of premises therein.

Executive orders, to include those declaring a state of emergency and directing evacuation, shall have the force and effect of law and the violation thereof shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor in every case where the executive order declares that its violation shall have such force and effect.

Such executive orders declaring a state of emergency may address exceptional circumstances that exist relating to an order of quarantine or an order of isolation concerning a communicable disease of public health threat that is issued by the State Health Commissioner for an affected area of the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 32.1.

Except as to emergency plans issued to prescribe actions to be taken in the event of disasters and emergencies, no rule, regulation, or order issued under this section shall have any effect beyond June 30 next following the next adjournment of the regular session of the General Assembly but the same or a similar rule, regulation, or order may thereafter be issued again if not contrary to law;

To appoint a State Coordinator of Emergency Management and authorize the appointment or employment of other personnel as is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to remove, in his discretion, any and all persons serving hereunder;

To procure supplies and equipment, to institute training and public information programs relative to emergency management and to take other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces in time of need;

To make such studies and surveys of industries, resources, and facilities in the Commonwealth as may be necessary to ascertain the capabilities of the Commonwealth and to plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof;

On behalf of the Commonwealth enter into mutual aid arrangements with other states and to coordinate mutual aid plans between political subdivisions of the Commonwealth. After a state of emergency is declared in another state and the Governor receives a written request for assistance from the executive authority of that state, the Governor may authorize the use in the other state of personnel, equipment, supplies, and materials of the Commonwealth, or of a political subdivision, with the consent of the chief executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision;

To delegate any administrative authority vested in him under this chapter, and to provide for the further delegation of any such authority, as needed;

Whenever, in the opinion of the Governor, the safety and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth require the exercise of emergency measures due to a threatened or actual disaster, he may declare a state of emergency to exist;

To request a major disaster declaration from the President, thereby certifying the need for federal disaster assistance and ensuring the expenditure of a reasonable amount of funds of the Commonwealth, its local governments, or other agencies for alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering resulting from the disaster;

To provide incident command system guidelines for state agencies and local emergency response organizations; and

Whenever, in the opinion of the Governor or his designee, an employee of a state or local public safety agency responding to a disaster has suffered an extreme personal or family hardship in the affected area, such as the destruction of a personal residence or the existence of living conditions that imperil the health and safety of an immediate family member of the employee, the Governor may direct the Comptroller of the Commonwealth to issue warrants not to exceed $2,500 per month, for up to three calendar months, to the employee to assist the employee with the hardship.

(1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 1981, c. 116; 1990, c. 95; 1997, c. 893; 2000, c. 309; 2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2006, c. 140; 2007, cc. 729, 742; 2008, cc. 121, 157.)

Cross references.

- For local authority to supply emergency financial assistance to farmers during declared major disasters, see

§

3.1-22.19.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see

§

18.2-11

.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2004, cc. 773 and 1021, cl. 2, provides: "That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment."

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 309, in the introductory paragraph, substituted "Management" for "Services" at the end of the first sentence, and "emergency services" for "civilian" near the middle of the second sentence; in subdivision (1), inserted the present second sentence, in the present third sentence, substituted "life, implement emergency mitigation, preparedness, response or recovery actions; prescribe" for "life or other emergency mitigation, response or recovery; prescribe" and inserted "including," and in the present fourth sentence, inserted "to include those declaring a state of emergency and directing evacuation"; in subdivision (3), substituted "training and public information programs relative to emergency management and to take other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations" for "training programs and public information programs, and to take all other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency service organizations"; added "as needed" at the end of subdivision (6); deleted "and" at the end of subdivision (7); in subdivision (8), substituted "To request a major disaster declaration from the President, thereby certifying the need for federal disaster assistance and ensuring the expenditure" for "When necessary, to request predisaster federal assistance or the declaration of a major disaster and certify the need for federal disaster assistance and to give assurance of the expenditure" and added "and" at the end thereof; and added subdivision (9).

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and inserted the next-to-last paragraph in subdivision (1).

The 2006 amendments.

- The 2006 amendment by c. 140 added subdivision (10) and made related changes.

The 2007 amendments.

- The 2007 amendments by cc. 729 and 742 are identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision (5).

The 2008 amendments.

- The 2008 amendments by cc. 121 and 157 are identical, and deleted "natural or man-made" preceding "disasters" at the end of the introductory paragraph; and deleted "man-made or natural" preceding "disaster" in subdivison (10).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Waiver of requirements for licensure of health professionals.

- The Governor has authority under this section to waive the statutory and regulatory requirements related to the licensure of health professionals during a state of emergency or declared disaster. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John M. O'Bannon, III, Member, House of Delegates, 02-069 (11/13/02).

Enforcement of quarantine in health emergency.

- The Governor, State Health Commissioner and Board of Health have the authority in a public health emergency to issue orders or regulations to enforce a quarantine. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John M. O'Bannon, III, Member, House of Delegates, 02-069 (11/13/02).

Control and allocation of services and resources.

- The Governor has the authority to control and allocate services and resources, including state government and private medical personnel and supplies, under any state or federal emergency services program; however, the Commonwealth's authority to take private resources is limited by the constitutional requirement to provide just compensation. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John M. O'Bannon, III, Member, House of Delegates, 02-069 (11/13/02).

Authority of Governor to initiate spending plan should legislature fail to enact budget bill.

- The Constitution imposes the clear and certain duty solely upon the General Assembly to make appropriations and states that no funds are to be paid out of the state treasury unless appropriated by law by the General Assembly. It is a question of fact whether conditions exist constituting an emergency under the Emergency Services and Disaster Law of 2000, and it is within the authority of the Governor to make that factual decision. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William J. Howell, Speaker of the House of Delegates, 06-044 (6/8/06).

§ 44-146.17.

INTERSTATE CIVIL DEFENSE COMPACT OF 1952

________

FORM OF

CIVIL DEFENSE AND MUTUAL AID COMPACT

An Interstate Compact Between

the

COMMONNWEALTH OF VIRGINIA

and the State of ______________

Whereas, the Congress of the United States of America has enacted the procedure for granting its consent to Civil Defense Compacts by an Act entitled, "Federal Civil Defense Act of 1950' (Public Law 920, 81st Congress, Second Session, Approved January 12, 1951), and

Whereas, Section 44-142 (6) of the Virginia Civil Defense Act, Chapter 121, 1952 Acts of the General Assembly, authorizes the Governor "on behalf of this State, to enter into mutual aid arrangements with other states and to coordinate mutual aid plans between political subdivisions of this State."
Now

THEREFORE, I, ____________________________ Governor of the COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, Pursuant to the above, do on behalf of the COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA enter into and ratify the following agreement with other contracting states, and the District of Columbia which are now or may hereafter become parties thereto:

Article 1. The purpose of this compact is to provide mutual aid among the States in meeting any emergency or disaster from enemy attack or other cause (natural or otherwise) including sabotage and subversive acts and direct attacks by bombs, shellfire, and atomic, radiological, chemical, bacteriological means, and other weapons.
The prompt, full and effective utilization of the resources of the respective States, including such resources as may be available from the United States Government or any other source, are essential to the safety, care and welfare of the people thereof in the event of enemy action or other emergency, and any other resources including personnel, equipment or supplies, shall be incorporated into a plan or plans of mutual aid to be developed among the Civil Defense agencies or similar bodies of the States that are parties hereto.
The Directors of Civil Defense of all party States shall constitute a committee to formulate plans and take all necessary steps for the implementation of this compact.

Article 2. It shall be the duty of each party State to formulate civil defense plans and programs for application within such State.
There shall be frequent consultation between the representatives of the States and with the United States Government and the free exchange of information and plans, including inventories of any materials and equipment available for civil defense.
In carrying out such civil defense plans and programs the party states shall so far as possible provide and follow uniform standards, practices and rules and regulations including:

Insignia, arm bands and any other distinctive articles to designate and distinguish the different civil defense services;

Blackouts and practice blackouts, air raid drills, mobilization of civil defense forces and other tests and exercises;

Warnings and signals for drills or attacks and the mechanical devices to be used in connection therewith;

The effective screening or extinguishing of all lights and lighting devices and appliances;

Shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections and the suspension of all other utility services;

All materials or equipment used or to be used for civil defense purposes in order to assure that such materials and equipment will be easily and freely interchangeable when used in or by any other party State;

The conduct of civilians and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic, prior, during and subsequent to drills or attacks;

The safety of public meetings or gatherings; and

Mobile support units.

Article 3. Any party State requested to render mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided that it is understood that the State rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such State.
Each party State shall extend to the civil defense forces of any other party State while operating within its State limits under the terms and conditions, of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights, privileges and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the State in which normally employed or rendering services.
Civil Defense forces will continue under the command control of their regular leaders but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the civil defense authorities of the State receiving assistance.

Article 4. Whenever any person holds a license, certificate or other permit issued by any state evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical or other skills, such person may render aid involving such skill in any other party State to meet any emergency or disaster and such State shall give due recognition to such license, certificate or other permit as if issued in the State in which aid is rendered.

Article 5. No party State or its officers or employees rendering aid in another State pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith.

Article 6. Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two or more States may differ from that appropriate among other States party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all States, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any State from entering into supplementary agreements with another State or States.
Such supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons, and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, equipment and supplies.

Article 7. Each party State shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the civil defense forces of that State and the representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within such State,

Article 8. Any party State rendering aid in another State pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party State receiving such aid for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment answering a request for aid, and for the cost incurred in connection with such requests; provided, that any aiding party State may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense, or other costs, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party State without charge or cost; and provided further that any two or more party States may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs as among those States.
The United States Government may relieve the party State receiving aid from any liability and reimburse the party State supplying civil defense forces for the compensation paid to and the transportation, subsistence and maintenance expenses of such forces during the time of the rendition of such aid or assistance outside the State and may also pay fair and reasonable compensation for the use or utilization of the supplies, materials, equipment or facilities so utilized or consumed.

Article 9. Plans for the orderly evacuation and reception of the civilian population as the result of an emergency or disaster shall be worked out from time to time between representatives of the party States and the various local civil defense areas thereof.
Such plans shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends and the forwarding of such supplies, and all other relevant factors.
Such plans shall provide that the party State receiving evacuees shall be reimbursed generally for the out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care and like items.
Such expenditures shall be reimbursed by the party State of which the evacuees are residents, or by the United States Government under plans approved by it.
After the termination of the emergency or disaster the party State of which the evacuees are resident shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support or repatriation of such evacuees.

Article 10. This compact shall be available to any State, territory or possession of the United States, and the District of Columbia.
The term "State" may also include any neighboring foreign country or province or state thereof.

Article 11. The Committee established pursuant to Article 1 of this compact may request the civil defense agency of the United States Government to act as an informational and coordinating body under this compact, and representatives of such agency of the United States Government may attend meetings of such committees.

Article 12. This compact shall become operative immediately upon its ratification by any State as between it and any other State or States so ratifying and shall be subject to approval by Congress unless prior Congressional approval has been given.
Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party States and with the Civil Defense Agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States Government.

Article 13. This compact shall continue in force and remain binding on each party State until the legislature or the Governor of such party State takes action to withdraw therefrom.
Such action shall not be effective until 30 days after notice thereof has been sent by the Governor of the party State desiring to withdraw to the Governors of all other party States.

Article 14. This compact shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in Article 1 hereof.
If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Compact cross references.

- As to provisions of other member states, see:

Arkansas: A.C.A.

§

12-76-102.

California: Cal Gov Code

§

178.

Delaware: 20 Del. C.

§

3301.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code

§

7-2209.

Kansas: K.S.A.

§

48-3201.

Maryland: Md. Public Safety Code,

§

14-602.

Michigan: MCLS

§

30.261

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb.

§

81-829.56.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann.

§

415.010.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat.

§

38A:20-3.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code

§

37-17.2-01.

Oregon: ORS

§

401.045.

Pennsylvania: 35 Pa.C.S.

§

7111.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws

§

30-15-14.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann.

§

25-9-20.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann.

§

58-2-402.

Utah: Utah Code Ann.

§

39-5-2.

Virgin Islands: 23 V.I.C.

§

1128.

§ 44-146.28:1. Compact enacted into law; terms.

The Emergency Management Assistance Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into by the Commonwealth of Virginia with all other states legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows:

EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE COMPACT

ARTICLE I.

PURPOSE AND AUTHORITIES.

This compact is made and entered into by and between the participating member states which enact this compact, hereinafter called party states. For the purposes of this compact, the term "states" is taken to mean the several states, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, and all U.S. territorial possessions.

The purpose of this compact is to provide for mutual assistance between the states entering into this compact in managing any emergency or disaster that is duly declared by the Governor of the affected state, whether arising from natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, civil emergency aspects of resources shortages, community disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

This compact shall also provide for mutual cooperation in emergency-related exercises, testing, or other training activities using equipment and personnel simulating performance of any aspect of the giving and receiving of aid by party states or subdivisions of party states during emergencies, such actions occurring outside actual declared emergency periods. Mutual assistance in this compact may include the use of the states' National Guard forces, either in accordance with the National Guard Mutual Assistance Compact or by mutual agreement between states.

ARTICLE II.

GENERAL IMPLEMENTATION.

Each party state entering into this compact recognizes that many emergencies transcend political jurisdictional boundaries and that intergovernmental coordination is essential in managing these and other emergencies under this compact. Each state further recognizes that there will be emergencies which require immediate access and present procedures to apply outside resources to make a prompt and effective response to such an emergency. This is because few, if any, individual states have all the resources they may need in all types of emergencies or the capability of delivering resources to areas where emergencies exist.

The prompt, full, and effective utilization of resources of the participating states, including any resources on hand or available from the federal government or any other source, that are essential to the safety, care, and welfare of the people in the event of any emergency or disaster declared by a party state, shall be the underlying principle on which all articles of this compact shall be understood.

On behalf of the Governor of each state participating in the compact, the legally designated state official who is assigned responsibility for emergency management will be responsible for formulation of the appropriate interstate mutual aid plans and procedures necessary to implement this compact.

ARTICLE III.

PARTY STATE RESPONSIBILITIES.

It shall be the responsibility of each party state to formulate procedural plans and programs for interstate cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this article. In formulating such plans, and in carrying them out, the party states, insofar as practical, shall:

Review individual state hazards analyses and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party states might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, emergency aspects of resources shortages, civil disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack;

Review party states' individual emergency plans and develop a plan which will determine the mechanism for the interstate management and provision of assistance concerning any potential emergency;

Develop interstate procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans;

Assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing the state boundaries;

Protect and assure uninterrupted delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue, and critical lifeline equipment, services, and resources, both human and material;

Inventory and set procedures for the interstate loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness; and

Provide, to the extent authorized by law, for temporary suspension of any statutes or ordinances that restrict the implementation of the above responsibilities.

The authorized representative of a party state may request assistance of another party state by contacting the authorized representative of that state. The provisions of this compact shall only apply to requests for assistance made by and to authorized representatives. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request shall be confirmed in writing within thirty days of the verbal request. Requests shall provide the following information:

A description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed, including, but not limited to, fire services, law enforcement, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services, and search and rescue;

The amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed, and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed; and

The specific place and time for staging of the assisting party's response and a point of contact at that location.

There shall be frequent consultation between state officials who have assigned emergency management responsibilities and other appropriate representatives of the party states with affected jurisdictions and the United States Government, with free exchange of information, plans, and resource records relating to emergency capabilities.

ARTICLE IV.

LIMITATIONS.

Any party state requested to render mutual aid or conduct exercises and training for mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state.

Each party state shall afford to the emergency forces of any party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers, except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state, duties, rights, and privileges as are afforded forces of the state in which they are performing emergency services. Emergency forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the emergency services authorities of the state receiving assistance. These conditions may be activated, as needed, only subsequent to a declaration of a state emergency or disaster by the governor of the party state that is to receive assistance or upon commencement of exercises or training for mutual aid and shall continue so long as the exercises or training for mutual aid are in progress, the state of emergency or disaster remains in effect, or loaned resources remain in the receiving state, whichever is longer.

ARTICLE V.

LICENSES AND PERMITS.

Whenever any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state party to the compact evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, and when such assistance is requested by the receiving party state, such person shall be deemed licensed, certified, or permitted by the state requesting assistance to render aid involving such skill to meet a declared emergency or disaster, subject to such limitations and conditions as the Governor of the requesting state may prescribe by executive order or otherwise.

ARTICLE VI.

LIABILITY.

Officers or employees of a party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be considered agents of the requesting state for tort liability and immunity purposes. No party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith. Good faith in this article shall not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

ARTICLE VII.

SUPPLEMENTARY AGREEMENTS.

Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two or more states may differ from that among the states that are party hereto, this compact contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein shall preclude any state entering into supplementary agreements with another state or affect any other agreements already in force between states. Supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, and equipment and supplies.

ARTICLE VIII.

COMPENSATION.

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency forces of that state and representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within their own state.

ARTICLE IX.

REIMBURSEMENT.

Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment and the provision of any service in answering a request for aid and for the costs incurred in connection with such requests; provided, that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense, or other cost, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and provided further, that any two or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs among those states. Article VIII expenses shall not be reimbursable under this article.

ARTICLE X.

EVACUATION.

Plans for the orderly evacuation and interstate reception of portions of the civilian population as the result of any emergency or disaster of sufficient proportions to so warrant, shall be worked out and maintained between the party states and the emergency management/services directors of the various jurisdictions where any type of incident requiring evacuations might occur. Such plans shall be put into effect by request of the state from which evacuees come and shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing, and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends, and the forwarding of such evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. Such plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees and the party state from which the evacuees come shall mutually agree as to reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care, and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed as agreed by the party state from which the evacuees come. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state from which the evacuees come shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support of repatriation of such evacuees.

ARTICLE XI.

IMPLEMENTATION.

This compact shall become effective immediately upon its enactment into law by any two states. Thereafter, this compact shall become effective as to any other state upon enactment by such state.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until thirty days after the Governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of such withdrawal to the Governors of all other party states. Such action shall not relieve the withdrawing state from obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and with the Federal Emergency Management Agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States Government.

ARTICLE XII.

VALIDITY.

This compact shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in Article I. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected.

ARTICLE XIII.

ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS.

Nothing in this compact shall authorize or permit the use of military force by the National Guard of a state at any place outside that state in any emergency for which the President is authorized by law to call into federal service the militia, or for any purpose for which the use of the Army or the Air Force would in the absence of express statutory authorization be prohibited under § 1385 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(1995, c. 280.)

Compact cross references.

- As to provisions of other member states, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala.

§

31-9-40.

Alaska: Alaska Stat.

§

26.23.136.

Arizona: A.R.S.

§

26-402.

Arkansas: A.C.A.

§

12-49-402.

California: Cal Gov Code

§

179.5.

Colorado: C.R.S. 24-60-2902.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat.

§

28-23a.

Delaware: 20 Del. C.

§

3401.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code

§

7-2332.

Florida: Fla. Stat.

§§

252.921 - 252.933.

Georgia: O.C.G.A.

§

38-3-81.

Hawaii: HRS

§

128F-2.

Idaho: Idaho Code

§

46-1018A.

Illinois: 45 ILCS 151/5.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann.

§

10-14-5-1 et seq.

Iowa: Iowa Code

§

29C.21.

Kansas: K.S.A.

§

48-9

a01.

Kentucky: KRS

§

39A.950.

Maine: 37-B M.R.S.

§§

921 - 933.

Maryland: Md. PUBLIC SAFETY Code Ann.

§

14-702.

Massachusetts: Mass. Ann. Laws Spec. Laws ch. S140,

§

1.

Michigan: MCL

§

3.1001.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat.

§

192.89.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann.

§

45-18-3.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno.,

§

10-3-1001.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann.

§

415.010.

New Hampshire: RSA 108:3.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat.

§

38A:20-5.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann.

§

12-10-15.

New York: NY CLS Exec

§

29-g.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat.

§§

166A-40 - 166A-53.

Ohio: ORC Ann. 5502.40.

Oklahoma: 63 Okl. St.

§§

684.1 - 684.13.

Oregon: ORS

§

401.043.

Pennsylvania: 35 Pa.C.S.

§

7601.

Puerto Rico: 1 L.P.R.A.

§§

621 - 633.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws

§§

30-15.9-1 - 30-15.9-14.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann.

§

25-9-420.

South Dakota: S.D. Codified Laws

§

33-15-48.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann.

§

58-2-403.

Texas: Tex. Health & Safety Code

§

778.001.

Utah: Utah Code Ann.

§

53-2-202.

Vermont: 20 V.S.A.

§§

101 - 112.

Vermont: 20 V.S.A.

§§

101 - 112.

Vermont: 20 V.S.A.

§§

101 - 112.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code

§

15-5-22.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat.

§

166.30.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat.

§

19-13-401 et seq.